Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Chapter 3. Corrupt Practices
[Repealed]

§§ 23-3-1 through 23-3-39.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§§23-3-1,23-3-3. [Codes, 1942, § 3158; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1952, ch. 392]

§§23-3-5,23-3-7. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3158.3 3158.5; Laws, 1948, chs. 310, 311]

§23-3-9. [Codes, 1942, § 3159; Laws, 1935, ch. 19]

§23-3-11. [Codes, 1942, § 3160; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1936, ch. 320; Laws, 1955 Ex ch. 100, § 2]

§23-3-13. [Codes, 1942, § 3164; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1960, ch. 448]

§23-3-15. [Codes, 1942, § 3165; Laws, 1935, ch. 19]

§23-3-17. [Codes, 1942, § 3166; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1979, ch. 487, § 4]

§§23-3-19 through23-3-39. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3167-3178; Laws, 1935, ch. 19]

§§ 23-3-41 through 23-3-47.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 333 and 334, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-3-41. [Codes, 1942, § 3179; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 1]

§23-3-43. [Codes, 1942, § 3181; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 2]

§23-3-45. [Codes, 1942, § 3182; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1968, ch. 567, § 1]

§23-3-47. [Codes, 1942, § 3183; Laws, 1935 ch. 19]

§§ 23-3-49 through 23-3-63.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§§23-3-49,23-3-51. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3184, 3185; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1968, ch. 567, §§ 2, 3]

§§23-3-53 through23-3-57. [Codes, 1942, § 3186-3188; Laws, 1935, ch. 19]

§23-3-59. [Codes, 1942, § 3189; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 23]

§§23-3-61 and23-3-63. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3190, 3191; Laws, 1935, ch. 19]

§§ 23-3-65 through 23-3-71.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 333 and 334, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§23-3-65. [Codes, 1942, § 3192; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 3]

§23-3-67. [Codes, 1942, § 3193; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1971, ch. 510, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 479, § 4]

§23-3-69. [Codes, 1942, § 3194; Laws, 1935, ch. 19]

§23-3-71. [Codes, 1942, § 3195; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1944, ch. 210]